Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 1. Prohibited Acts.
Sec. 04.16.052.
Furnishing of alcoholic beverages to persons under the age of 21 by licensees.

A licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee may not with criminal negligence

allow another person to sell, barter, or give an alcoholic beverage to a person under the age of 21 years within licensed premises;

allow a person under the age of 21 years to enter and remain within licensed premises except as provided in AS

04.16.049

;

allow a person under the age of 21 years to consume an alcoholic beverage within licensed premises;

allow a person under the age of 21 years to sell or serve alcoholic beverages;

while working on licensed premises, furnish or deliver alcoholic beverages to a person under the age of 21 years.

(b)

The holder of a license is strictly liable for an offense committed under (a) of this section by an employee or agent of the licensee on the licensed premises, punishable by an administrative penalty of $250. Notwithstanding AS

04.11.370(a)(4)

and (5) and AS

04.16.180(b)(1)

, the board may not order suspension of the license for the first violation committed on the licensed premises under this section.

(c)

A person who violates (a) of this section commits the offense of licensee, employee, or agent furnishing alcohol to a minor.

(d)

Licensee, employee, or agent furnishing alcohol to a minor is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

(e)

A licensee who knowingly allows an agent or employee of the licensee to commit the offense of licensee, employee, or agent furnishing alcohol to a minor under (c) of this section commits the crime of failure to ensure compliance relating to furnishing alcohol to a minor.

(f)

Failure to ensure compliance relating to furnishing alcohol to a minor is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 10 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 7 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 105 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.055.
Room rental for purposes of consuming alcoholic beverages.

A person may not rent a room in a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business for the purpose of providing alcoholic beverages to a person under the age of 21 years.

History.

(§ 3 ch 3 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.16.055.
Room rental for purposes of consuming alcoholic beverages.

A person may not rent a room in a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business for the purpose of providing alcoholic beverages to a person under the age of 21 years.

A person who knowingly rents a room in a hotel, motel, resort, or similar business for the purpose of providing alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age commits the crime of renting a room for the purpose of providing alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age.

Renting a room for the purpose of providing alcoholic beverages to a person under 21 years of age is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 3 SLA 1995; am § 106 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.057.
Permitting minor to illegally possess liquor in dwelling.

Except as provided by AS

04.16.051

, a person who is physically in possession and exercising dominion and control over a dwelling may not knowingly permit a person under 21 years of age to possess an alcoholic beverage in the dwelling.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation and shall be punished as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 2007)

Sec. 04.16.057.
Permitting minor to illegally possess liquor in dwelling.

Except as provided by AS

04.16.051

, a person who is physically in possession and exercising dominion and control over a dwelling may not knowingly permit a person under 21 years of age to possess an alcoholic beverage in the dwelling.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

History.

(§ 1 ch 26 SLA 2007; am § 107 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.059.
Aggravated penalties for certain violations involving a person under 21 years of age and committed by a sex offender or child kidnapper.

Notwithstanding AS

04.16.051

,

04.16.055

,

04.16.057

, and

04.16.180

, the penalty for a violation of AS

04.16.051

,

04.16.055

, or

04.16.057

that involved a person under 21 years of age and that was committed by a person who is required to register as a sex offender or child kidnapper under AS 12.63 is as follows:

if the underlying offense is a violation, a sex offender or child kidnapper committing the offense is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in AS 12.55;

if the underlying offense is a class A misdemeanor, a sex offender or child kidnapper committing the offense is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished as provided in AS 12.55;

if the underlying offense is a class C felony, a sex offender or child kidnapper committing the offense is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished as provided in AS 12.55.

In this section, “sex offender or child kidnapper” has the meaning given in AS

12.63.100

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 21 SLA 2011)

Sec. 04.16.060.
Purchase by or delivery to persons under the age of 21.

A person under the age of 21 years may not purchase alcoholic beverages or solicit another to purchase alcoholic beverages for the person under the age of 21.

A person may not influence the sale, gift, or service of an alcoholic beverage to a person under the age of 21 years, by misrepresenting the age of that person.

A person may not order or receive an alcoholic beverage from a licensee, an agent or employee of the licensee, or another person, for the purpose of selling, giving, or serving it to a person under the age of 21 years.

A person under the age of 21 years may not enter licensed premises where alcoholic beverages are sold and offer or present to a licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee a birth certificate or other written evidence of age, that is fraudulent or false or that is not actually the person’s own, or otherwise misrepresent the person’s age, for the purpose of inducing the licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee to sell, give, serve, or furnish alcoholic beverages contrary to law.

A person under the age of 21 who is seeking to enter and remain in a licensed premises under AS

04.16.049(a)(2)

or (3) may not misrepresent the person’s age or having obtained the consent of the parent or guardian required by that section.

A person does not violate this section if the person performs an act proscribed under this section, the person performs that act at the request of a peace officer, the peace officer accompanies, supervises, or otherwise observes the person’s act, and the purpose of the act is to assist in the enforcement of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 2005)

Sec. 04.16.060.
Purchase by or delivery to persons under the age of 21.

A person under the age of 21 years may not purchase alcoholic beverages or solicit another to purchase alcoholic beverages for the person under the age of 21.

A person may not influence the sale, gift, or service of an alcoholic beverage to a person under the age of 21 years, by misrepresenting the age of that person.

A person may not order or receive an alcoholic beverage from a licensee, an agent or employee of the licensee, or another person, for the purpose of selling, giving, or serving it to a person under the age of 21 years.

A person under the age of 21 years may not enter licensed premises where alcoholic beverages are sold and offer or present to a licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee a birth certificate or other written evidence of age, that is fraudulent or false or that is not actually the person’s own, or otherwise misrepresent the person’s age, for the purpose of inducing the licensee or an agent or employee of the licensee to sell, give, serve, or furnish alcoholic beverages contrary to law.

A person under the age of 21 who is seeking to enter and remain in a licensed premises under AS

04.16.049(a)(2)

may not misrepresent the person’s age or having obtained the consent of the parent or guardian required by that section.

A person does not violate this section if the person performs an act proscribed under this section, the person performs that act at the request of a peace officer, the peace officer accompanies, supervises, or otherwise observes the person’s act, and the purpose of the act is to assist in the enforcement of this section.

A person who violates (a) of this section commits the offense of purchase by a person under 21 years of age.

A person who violates (b) or (c) of this section commits the offense of delivery to a person under 21 years of age.

Purchase by a person under 21 years of age is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

Delivery to a person under 21 years of age is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $500.

For a person under 21 years of age who commits an offense under (g) of this section, the violation must be charged and filed with the court as a separate case and may not be combined or joined with any other minor offense or criminal charge in one action at the time of filing. A court may reduce the fine to $50 for a person who has not more than one previous violation or to $250 for a person who has two or more previous violations if the person provides the court, not later than six months after a judgment of conviction is entered, with proof of completion of

an alcohol safety action program or a juvenile alcohol safety action program developed, designated, or approved by the Department of Health under AS 47.37; or

a community diversion panel.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 11 ch 109 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 72 SLA 2005; am § 108 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 109 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.065.
Civil penalty for violations of AS 04.16.060.

A person who has attained 18 years of age, or an emancipated minor, who violates AS

04.16.060

is, in addition to any criminal penalty provided by law, liable in a civil action to the licensee for a penalty of $1,500 plus costs and reasonable attorney fees.

A person, having legal custody of an unemancipated minor who solicits another person to violate AS

04.16.060

, is liable in a civil action for a penalty of $1,000, plus costs and reasonable attorney fees, to the licensee from whom the other person purchased, ordered, or received an alcoholic beverage in violation of AS

04.16.060

.

It is a condition precedent to maintaining an action under this section that the owner or seller of the merchandise send by first class mail to the defendant at the defendant’s last known address 15 days or more before the action is commenced a notice demanding the relief authorized. The board may adopt regulations prescribing the form of this notice. It is not a condition precedent to maintaining an action under this section that the person who violated AS

04.16.060

or solicited a violation was charged or convicted under any statute or ordinance.

In this section, “emancipated minor” means a minor whose disabilities have been removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 129 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 2010)

Sec. 04.16.070.
Sales on election day.

A person may not sell, barter, give, consume, or dispose of alcoholic beverages within licensed premises

in the state on a day on which a statewide special, primary, or general election is held for the purpose of voting for a candidate for public office, until the polls have closed;

in a municipality on a day on which a local option election or an election is held for the purpose of voting for a candidate for public office, until the polls are closed.

The governing body of a municipality may provide by ordinance that the provisions of this section do not apply in a municipality.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Collateral references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d, Intoxicating Liquors, § 227.

48 C.J.S., Intoxicating Liquors, § 307.

Sec. 04.16.070.
Sales on election day.

History.

[§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.16.080.
Sales or consumption at school events.

A person may not sell or consume alcoholic beverages during a school event at the site of the event.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.16.080.
Consumption at school events.

A person who is 21 years of age or older may not consume alcoholic beverages during a school event at the site of the event if the event is expected to attract attendees under 21 years of age.

(b

A person who is 21 years of age or older who consumes an alcoholic beverage during a school event at the site of the event under (a) of this section commits the offense of consuming at a school event.

(c)

Consuming at a school event is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $100.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 110 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 111 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.090.
Prohibition of bottle clubs.

A person may not maintain a place in which alcoholic beverages are received or kept, or to which alcoholic beverages are brought, for consumption by members of the public or by members of a club, corporation, or association, unless the person is authorized to do so under this title.

A person may not maintain, operate, or lease premises for the purpose of providing, for a consideration, a place for drinking alcoholic beverages by members of the public or other persons, unless the person is authorized to do so under this title.

For the purposes of this section, “consideration” includes but is not limited to cover charge, the sale of food, ice, mixers, or other liquids used with alcoholic beverage drinks, or the furnishing of glassware or other containers for use in the consumption of alcoholic beverages.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.16.090.
Prohibition of bottle clubs.

A person may not maintain a place in which alcoholic beverages are received or kept, or to which alcoholic beverages are brought, for consumption by members of the public or by members of a club, corporation, or association, unless the person is authorized to do so under this title.

A person may not maintain, operate, or lease premises for the purpose of providing, for a consideration, a place for drinking alcoholic beverages by members of the public or other persons, unless the person is authorized to do so under this title.

In this section, “consideration” includes a cover charge, the sale of food, ice, mixers, or other liquids used with alcoholic beverage drinks, the furnishing of glassware or other containers for use in the consumption of alcoholic beverages, other charges for access to the licensed premises, or other services or products provided on the licensed premises.

A person who knowingly violates this section commits the crime of maintaining a bottle club.

Maintaining a bottle club is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 112 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 113 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.100.
Restriction on size of containers.

A person may not sell alcoholic beverages in 1/6 gallon or 1/10 gallon containers, nor may a person sell alcoholic beverages in a container deceptively similar in appearance to a container of a different volume.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.16.100.
Restriction on size of containers.

History.

[§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]

Sec. 04.16.110.
Sale of certain alcoholic beverages prohibited.

A person may not sell an alcoholic beverage if it

is intended for human consumption and is in powdered form; or

contains more than 76 percent alcohol by volume.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.16.110.
Sale of certain alcoholic beverages prohibited.

A person may not sell an alcoholic beverage if it

is intended for human consumption and is in powdered form; or

contains more than 76 percent alcohol by volume.

A person who knowingly sells an alcoholic beverage in violation of (a) of this section commits the crime of sale of a prohibited alcoholic beverage.

Sale of a prohibited alcoholic beverage is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 114 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.120.
Removal or introduction of alcoholic beverages.

A person may not remove from licensed premises alcoholic beverages that have been sold or furnished for consumption only on the premises.

Except as provided in this subsection, a person may not bring an alcoholic beverage into licensed premises for use or consumption by oneself or another person on the premises unless that person is a licensee, an agent, employee, or common carrier in the regular course of employment. With the permission of the licensee, a person may bring wine into premises licensed as a beverage dispensary or a restaurant or eating place for consumption by the person while eating food served at a table on the licensed premises. The beverage dispensary or restaurant or eating place may charge a corkage fee for serving wine supplied by a customer.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person may remove from licensed premises the unconsumed portion of one or more bottles of wine that were partially consumed with a meal if (1) the original or a similar type of cork is reinserted in each bottle by the licensee and the cork can only be removed by a corkscrew or other similar device, or (2) each bottle is sealed or packaged by the licensee in a manner set by the board. Notwithstanding another provision of law, each bottle of wine that is recorked, sealed, or packaged as provided in this subsection is not an open container if the cork reinserted by the licensee or the seal made by the licensee has not been disturbed.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 2008)

Sec. 04.16.120.
Removal or introduction of alcoholic beverages.

A person may not remove from licensed premises alcoholic beverages that have been sold or furnished for consumption only on the premises.

Except as provided in this subsection, a person may not bring an alcoholic beverage into licensed premises for use or consumption by oneself or another person on the premises unless that person is a licensee, an agent, employee, or common carrier in the regular course of employment. With the permission of the licensee, a person may bring wine into premises licensed as a beverage dispensary or a restaurant or eating place for consumption by the person while eating food served at a table on the licensed premises. The beverage dispensary or restaurant or eating place may charge a corkage fee for serving wine supplied by a customer.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person may remove from licensed premises the unconsumed portion of one or more bottles of wine that were partially consumed with a meal if (1) the original or a similar type of cork is reinserted in each bottle by the licensee and the cork can only be removed by a corkscrew or other similar device, or (2) each bottle is sealed or packaged by the licensee in a manner set by the board. Notwithstanding another provision of law, each bottle of wine that is recorked, sealed, or packaged as provided in this subsection is not an open container if the cork reinserted by the licensee or the seal made by the licensee has not been disturbed.

A person who removes an alcoholic beverage from licensed premises in violation of (a) of this section and a person who brings an alcoholic beverage onto licensed premises in violation of (b) of this section commits the offense of removal or introduction of alcoholic beverages.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the holder of a beverage dispensary license under AS

04.09.200

, the holder of a beverage dispensary tourism license under AS

04.09.350

, or the holder’s employee may transport alcoholic beverages across unlicensed portions of a hotel, motel, or large resort if the

licensee holds an endorsement under AS

04.09.430

or

04.09.440

; and

licensee or employee is walking directly from one licensed area of the premises to another licensed area.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person may remove alcoholic beverages from the licensed premises of a beverage dispensary license under AS

04.09.200

or a beverage dispensary tourism license under AS

04.09.350

for consumption on unlicensed portions of a large resort if the licensee holds a large resort endorsement under AS

04.09.440

.

Removal or introduction of alcoholic beverages is a violation and is punishable by a fine of $100.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 2008; am § 115 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.125.
Alcoholic beverages transported by common carrier.

A person may not use a common carrier to transport alcoholic beverages into an area that has restricted the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2) unless

the shipping container holding the alcoholic beverages is clearly labeled as containing alcoholic beverages with letters that contrast in color to the shipping container and that are at least two inches in height; and

an itemized invoice showing the quantity and purchase value of distilled spirits, of wine, and of malt beverages is attached to the outside of the shipping container.

This section does not apply to

a person transporting not more than

two liters of wine;

one gallon of malt beverages; or

one liter of distilled spirits; or

the transportation of alcoholic beverages for use on premises allowed under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)

— (3) or (b)(2) or for use under a permit allowed under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)

.

In this section,

“common carrier” means a motor vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, or railroad car available for public hire to transport freight or passengers;

“transport” has the meaning given in AS

04.11.499

.

History.

(§ 9 ch 156 SLA 1988; am §§ 33, 34 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 2001)

Sec. 04.16.125.
Alcoholic beverages transported by common carrier.

A person may not use a common carrier to transport alcoholic beverages into an area that has restricted the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2) unless

the shipping container holding the alcoholic beverages is clearly labeled as containing alcoholic beverages; and

an itemized invoice showing the quantity and purchase value of distilled spirits, wine, and brewed beverages is attached to the outside of the shipping container.

The requirements in (a) of this section do not apply to

a person transporting

two liters or less of wine;

one gallon or less of brewed beverages; or

one liter or less of distilled spirits; or

the transportation of alcoholic beverages for use on premises allowed under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)

or (3) or (b)(2) or for use under a permit allowed under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)

.

In this section,

“common carrier” means a motor vehicle, watercraft, aircraft, or railroad car available for public hire to transport freight or passengers;

“transport” has the meaning given in AS

04.11.499

.

A person who knowingly violates this section commits the crime of unauthorized transportation of alcoholic beverages by common carrier into a local option area.

Unauthorized transportation of alcoholic beverages by common carrier into a local option area is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 9 ch 156 SLA 1988; am §§ 33, 34 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 2001; am § 116 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 117 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 118 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.130.
Stock confined to licensed premises.

Unless authorized under AS

04.21.060

, a licensee may not store before sale any alcoholic beverages elsewhere than on the premises indicated on the license.

This section does not apply to stocks of beer carried on a delivery truck by a licensed wholesaler if carried for the purpose of sale and delivery to persons licensed under this title in quantities of not less than 10 gallons for each sale.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Sec. 04.16.130.
Stock confined to licensed premises.

Unless authorized under AS

04.21.060

, a licensee may not store before sale any alcoholic beverages elsewhere than on the premises indicated on the license.

This section does not apply to stocks of beer carried on a delivery truck by a licensed wholesaler if carried for the purpose of sale and delivery to persons licensed under this title in quantities of not less than 10 gallons for each sale.

A person who violates this section commits the offense of unauthorized storage of alcoholic beverages.

Unauthorized storage of alcoholic beverages is a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 119 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.140.
Sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages in a warehouse.

Alcoholic beverages may not be sold or consumed on premises approved for storage under AS

04.21.060

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.16.140.
Sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages in a warehouse.

Alcoholic beverages may not be sold or consumed on premises approved for storage under AS

04.21.060

.

A person who knowingly violates (a) of this section commits the offense of sale or consumption of an alcoholic beverage in a warehouse.

Sale or consumption of an alcoholic beverage in a warehouse is a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 120 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.150.
Licensee responsible for violations.

A licensee may neither knowingly allow agents or employees to violate this title or regulations adopted under this title nor recklessly or with criminal negligence fail to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

with the result that an agent or employee of the licensee violates a law or regulation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For duty of board to file criminal complaint, see AS

04.11.535

; for civil liability of persons providing alcoholic beverages, see AS

04.21.020

.

Sec. 04.16.150.
Licensee responsible for violations.

A licensee may neither knowingly allow agents or employees to violate this title or regulations adopted under this title nor recklessly or with criminal negligence fail to act in accordance with the duty prescribed under AS

04.21.030

with the result that an agent or employee of the licensee violates a law or regulation.

Except as provided under AS 04.16.030(f) and 04.16.052(e), a licensee who knowingly violates (a) of this section commits the offense of failure to ensure compliance.

Failure to ensure compliance is a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 121 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.160.
Restriction on purchasing alcoholic beverages.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a person who is 21 years of age or older may not purchase alcoholic beverages if the person has been ordered to refrain from consuming alcoholic beverages under AS

12.55.015(a)(13)

or as part of a sentence for conviction of a crime under AS

28.35.030

,

28.35.032

, or a similar municipal ordinance, as a condition of probation or parole from a conviction under AS

28.35.030

,

28.35.032

, or a similar municipal ordinance, or as a condition of probation or parole for any other crime. The restriction on purchasing alcoholic beverages applies during the period that the person is required to refrain from consuming alcoholic beverages under the sentence or condition of probation or parole.

A court imposing a restriction on a person under (a) of this section, and the Department of Corrections, shall notify the person that an identification card issued under AS

18.65.310

must list the restriction imposed for the period of the person’s probation or parole.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(l)(1), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), inserted “, or as a condition of probation or parole for any other crime” preceding “The restriction”, and made a related change.

Sec. 04.16.160.
Restriction on purchasing alcoholic beverages.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a person who is 21 years of age or older may not purchase alcoholic beverages if the person has been ordered to refrain from consuming alcoholic beverages under AS

12.55.015(a)(13)

or as part of a sentence for conviction of a crime under AS

28.35.030

,

28.35.032

, or a similar municipal ordinance, as a condition of probation or parole from a conviction under AS

28.35.030

,

28.35.032

, or a similar municipal ordinance, or as a condition of probation or parole for any other crime. The restriction on purchasing alcoholic beverages applies during the period that the person is required to refrain from consuming alcoholic beverages under the sentence or condition of probation or parole.

A court imposing a restriction on a person under (a) of this section, and the Department of Corrections, shall notify the person that an identification card issued under AS

18.65.310

must list the restriction imposed for the period of the person’s probation or parole.

A person who knowingly fails to comply with a restriction on purchasing alcoholic beverages in violation of (a) of this section commits the crime of failure to comply with a restriction on purchasing alcoholic beverages.

Failure to comply with a restriction on purchasing alcoholic beverages is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 122 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.170.
Source of alcoholic beverages.

Alcoholic beverages for consumption by the purchaser may not be sold unless obtained from a person licensed under this title.

A person transporting alcoholic beverages into the state may not sell those alcoholic beverages to a person not licensed under this title, unless the alcoholic beverages are used for religious, industrial, pharmaceutical, or medical purposes.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.16.170.
Source of alcoholic beverages.

Alcoholic beverages for consumption by the purchaser may not be sold unless obtained from a person licensed under this title.

A person transporting alcoholic beverages into the state may not sell those alcoholic beverages to a person not licensed under this title, unless the alcoholic beverages are used for religious, industrial, pharmaceutical, or medical purposes, or as allowed under AS

04.09.370

.

A licensee who knowingly violates (a) or (b) of this section commits the crime of sale of alcoholic beverages from or to an unlicensed person.

Sale of alcoholic beverages from or to an unlicensed person is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 123 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 124 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.172.
Restrictions on purchase and sale of alcoholic beverages.

A person licensed under AS

04.11.090

,

04.11.100

,

04.11.110

, or

04.11.150

may not purchase, sell, or offer for sale an alcoholic beverage unless the alcoholic beverage being purchased, sold, or offered for sale was obtained from a person licensed under

AS

04.11.160

as a primary source of supply for the alcoholic beverage being purchased, sold, or offered for sale;

AS

04.11.150

and the alcoholic beverage being purchased, sold, or offered for sale was obtained from a person licensed under AS

04.11.160

as a primary source of supply; or

AS

04.11.130

,

04.11.140

, or

04.11.170

.

History.

(§ 35 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1996)

Sec. 04.16.172.
Restrictions on purchase and sale of alcoholic beverages.

A person licensed under AS

04.09.200

,

04.09.210

,

04.09.220

,

04.09.230

,

04.09.270

,

04.09.280

,

04.09.290

,

04.09.300

,

04.09.310

,

04.09.320

,

04.09.330

,

04.09.340

,

04.09.350

, or

04.09.360

not purchase, sell, or offer for sale an alcoholic beverage unless the alcoholic beverage being purchased, sold, or offered for sale was obtained from a person licensed under

AS

04.09.100

or

04.09.110

as a primary source of supply for the alcoholic beverage being purchased, sold, or offered for sale;

AS

04.09.230

and the alcoholic beverage being purchased, sold, or offered for sale was obtained from a person licensed under AS

04.09.100

or

04.09.110

as a primary source of supply; or

AS

04.09.020

,

04.09.030

, or

04.09.040

.

(b)

A licensee who knowingly violates (a) of this section commits the crime of licensee obtaining alcoholic beverages from an unlicensed seller.

(c)

Licensee obtaining alcoholic beverages from an unlicensed seller is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 35 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1996; am § 125 ch 8 SLA 2022; am § 126 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.16.175.
Furnishing alcoholic beverages in aid of gambling enterprise.

An agent or employee of a gambling enterprise may not furnish an alcoholic beverage to a player.

In this section, “gambling enterprise” and “player” have the meanings given them in AS

11.66.280

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized into subsections in 1986.

Collateral references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d, Intoxicating Liquors, § 239.

Sec. 04.16.175.
Furnishing alcoholic beverages in aid of gambling enterprise.

An agent or employee of a gambling enterprise may not furnish an alcoholic beverage to a player.

In this section, “gambling enterprise” and “player” have the meanings given them in AS

11.66.280

.

A person who knowingly furnishes an alcoholic beverage to a player in violation of (a) of this section commits the crime of furnishing an alcoholic beverage in aid of a gambling enterprise.

Furnishing an alcoholic beverage in aid of a gambling enterprise is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 127 ch 8 SLA 2022)